Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202614-207
City council; general election; ballot; form; applicable law.

At the general election at which city council members are to be elected, the ballot shall be prepared in substantially the same form as provided in section 14-205, and the person receiving the highest number of votes in each of the city council districts shall be the city council member elected. The general election shall be conducted pursuant to the Election Act unless otherwise provided in the home rule charter or city code.

Laws 1921, c. 116, art. II, § 7, p. 422;

C.S.1922, § 3532;

C.S.1929, § 14-207;

R.S.1943, § 14-207;

Laws 1979, LB 80, § 6;

Laws 1979, LB 329, § 8;

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 474;

Laws 2022, LB800, § 41;

Laws 2025, LB521, § 6.

Election Act, see section 32-101.